Hawaii statutes.
[§414-356] Payment. (a) Except as
provided in section 414-358, as soon as the proposed corporate action is taken,
or upon receipt of a payment demand, the corporation shall pay each dissenter
who complied with section 414-354 the amount the corporation estimates to be
the fair value of the dissenter's shares, plus accrued interest.

(b) The payment must be accompanied by:

(1) The corporation's balance sheet as of the end of
a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen months before the date of payment, an
income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders' equity
for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

(2) A statement of the corporation's estimate of the
fair value of the shares;

(3) An explanation of how the interest was
calculated;

(4) A statement of the dissenter's right to demand
payment under section 414-359; and

(5) A copy of this part. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next